hr-HR: Sistem blok-flaute: Barok; Njemački; Ostalo
fr: Système de doigté de la flûte à bec: Baroque; Allemand; Autre
pl: System palcowania rejestratora: Barok; niemiecki; Inne
es: Sistema de digitación de flauta dulce: Baroque; Alemán; Otros
ko: 리코더 운지법 시스템: 바로크; 독일어; 기타
zh-TW: 豎笛指法系統: Baroque; 德語; 其他
tr: Kaydedici parmak sistemi: Barok; Almanca; Diğer
sv: Fingersättningssystem på blockflöjt: Barock; Tyska; Övrigt
ja: リコーダーの運指システム: バロック; ドイツ語; その他
lt-LT: Išilginės fleitos dengimų lentelė: Barokas; Vokiškas; Kita
ro-RO: Sistem de digitație recorder: Baroc; German; Altele
zh-CN: 竖笛指法系统: 巴洛克风格; 德语; 其他
ru: Аппликатурная система блокфлейты: Барокко; Немецкий; Другое
el: Σύστημα παιξίματος φλογέρας με τα δάχτυλα: Μπαρόκ; Γερμανική; Άλλο
nb: Fingersettingssystem for blokkfløyte: Barokk; Tysk; Annet
vi: Hệ thống sáo: Baroque; Tiếng Đức; Khác
de: Griffsystem der Blockflöte: Barock; Deutsch; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Systém prstokladu zobcovej flauty: Barokový; Nemecký; Iné
en: Recorder fingering system: Baroque; German; Other
pt-PT: Sistema de posições de dedos de flauta de bisel: Barroco; Alemão; Outro
pt-BR: Sistema de dedilhado no gravador: Barroco; Alemão; Outro
da: Recorderfingersætningssystem: Barok; Tysk; Andet
bg-BG: Система за пръсти за блокфлейта: Baroque; Немска; Други
it: Sistema di diteggiatura del flauto dolce: Barocco; Tedesco; Altro
cs: Prstokladový systém zobcové flétny: Baroko; němčina; Jiné
fi: Nokkahuilun sormitusjärjestelmä: Barokki; Saksa; Muu
sl-SI: Prstni sistem kljunaste flavte: Baročni; Nemški; Drugo
th: ระบบนิ้วของรีคอร์เดอร์: บาโรก; ภาษาเยอรมัน; อื่นๆ
hu: Fuvola fogásrendszere: Barokk; Német; Egyéb
nl: Vingerzettingssysteem blokfluit: Barok; Duits; Andere